Nebraska, session 109, LB1123.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 11 of this act:
(1) Brady-Giglio case law means Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83
(1963), and Giglio v. United States, 405 U.S. 150 (1972), and subsequent
cases of the Supreme Court of the United States and the Supreme Court of
Nebraska;
(2) Brady-Giglio list means a list compiled by a prosecuting agency
containing the names and details of officers who are alleged to have
impaired their own credibility, due to misconduct, bias, or otherwise,
such that disclosure to a criminal defendant would be required under
Brady-Giglio case law;
(3) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(4) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(5) Officer means:
(a) A law enforcement officer; or
(b) A correctional officer employed by a jail or by the Department
of Correctional Services;
(6) Prosecuting agency means the Department of Justice, the office
of a county attorney or city attorney, or a special prosecutor; and
(7) Public safety agency means:
(a) A law enforcement agency;
(b) A city or county jail;
(c) The Department of Correctional Services; or
(d) Any other agency of state or local government that employs
officers.
Sec. 2. (1) An officer shall not be discharged, disciplined, or
threatened with discharge or discipline, or subject to revocation or
suspension of a certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, solely
because a prosecuting agency has:
(a) Placed an officer on a Brady-Giglio list or determined that such
-2-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
officer may be placed on such a list; or
(b) Disclosed to any person that an officer is on a Brady-Giglio
list or under consideration to be placed on such a list.
(2) This section does not prohibit a dismissal, suspension,
demotion, or any other disciplinary action against an officer, or against
a certificate issued under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, based on the
underlying action that resulted in such officer being placed on a Brady-
Giglio list or being considered for placement on such list.
Sec. 3. A prosecuting agency that maintains a Brady-Giglio list
shall adopt a policy that, at a minimum, includes all of the following:
(1) The criteria used by the prosecuting agency to place an
officer's name on a Brady-Giglio list;
(2) The officer's right to receive written notice before the
prosecuting agency places the officer's name on a Brady-Giglio list,
including the proposed rationale for placing such officer's name on the
list, and the officer's right to provide input to the prosecuting agency
before the prosecuting agency makes a determination of whether the
officer's name should be placed on a Brady-Giglio list;
(3) The duty of the prosecuting agency to provide notice of the
prosecuting agency's decision regarding placement of the officer's name
on a Brady-Giglio list and the rationale for placing such officer's name
on the list;
(4) The officer's right to request reconsideration of the
prosecuting agency's determination to include the officer's name on a
Brady-Giglio list and to submit supporting and corroborating documents
and evidence in support of the officer's request for reconsideration; and
(5) The applicable time frame and procedures for notifying the
officer of the prosecuting agency's final decision on an officer's
request for reconsideration.
Sec. 4. (1) Before a prosecuting agency places an officer's name on
a Brady-Giglio list, the prosecuting agency shall send a written notice
-3-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
by mail or email to the officer's current or last known employment
address. Upon receipt of the notice, and if the officer's contact
information is known, the officer's current or last known employer shall
provide the written notice to the officer. The written notice shall
include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) A notice that the officer's name may be placed on a Brady-Giglio
list and the proposed rationale for placing such officer's name on the
list;
(b) An explanation of the officer's right to request any document,
record, or other evidence in the possession of the prosecuting agency
relevant to the determination of whether the officer's name should be
placed on a Brady-Giglio list;
(c) An explanation of the officer's right to provide input to the
prosecuting agency prior to the prosecuting agency's determination of
whether the officer's name should be placed on a Brady-Giglio list;
(d) An explanation of the prosecuting agency's procedural
requirements for an officer to provide input to the prosecuting agency
prior to the prosecuting agency's determination of whether the officer's
name should be placed on a Brady-Giglio list; and
(e) Notice of the procedures the prosecuting agency uses to
determine what evidence is exculpatory evidence that must be disclosed to
a criminal defendant under Brady-Giglio case law and the procedures the
prosecuting agency will use to determine whether such evidence will be
admissible for the purposes of a challenge to the testimony of the
officer.
(2) If the prosecuting agency makes a determination to place the
officer's name on a Brady-Giglio list, the prosecuting agency shall send
a written notice by mail or email to the officer's current or last known
employment address. Upon receipt of the notice, and if the officer's
contact information is known, the officer's current or last known
employer shall provide the written notice to the officer. The written
-4-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
notice shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
(a) An explanation of the officer's right to request reconsideration
of the allegations and the placement of the officer's name on a Brady-
Giglio list;
(b) An explanation of the prosecuting agency's procedural
requirements for submitting a request for reconsideration, including the
method and time frame for submitting the request and any supporting and
corroborating documents and evidence from any pertinent sources; and
(c) A statement that, if the officer intends to make a request for
reconsideration, the officer shall submit a written request for
reconsideration to the prosecuting agency within ten business days after
receiving the notice.
(3) If an officer submits a request for reconsideration pursuant to
this section and the officer's request for reconsideration is approved by
the prosecuting agency on its merits, the prosecuting agency shall remove
the officer's name from the Brady-Giglio list.
Sec. 5. (1) On or before November 1, 2026, each prosecuting agency
that maintains a Brady-Giglio list shall:
(a) Identify each officer who (i) was placed on such list prior to
the operative date of this section and (ii) who is still employed as an
officer; and
(b) Send a written notice by mail or email to the officer's current
or last known employment address. Upon receipt of the notice, and if the
officer's contact information is known, the officer's current or last
known employer shall provide the written notice to the officer.
(2) The written notice shall include, at a minimum, all of the
following:
(a) An explanation of the officer's right to make a request to
reconsider any allegation and the placement of the officer's name on a
Brady-Giglio list;
(b) An explanation of the prosecuting agency's procedural
-5-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
requirements for submitting a request for reconsideration, including the
method and time frame for submitting the request for reconsideration and
any supporting or corroborating document and evidence from any pertinent
source; and
(c) A statement that, if the officer intends to make a request for
reconsideration, the officer shall submit the written request for
reconsideration to the prosecuting agency within ten business days after
receiving the notice.
(3) An officer described in subsection (1) of this section who
wishes to submit a request for reconsideration pursuant to this section
shall do so within ten business days after receiving such notice. If such
notice is not provided or is not received by the officer, the officer may
submit such a request for reconsideration on or before February 1, 2028.
Sec. 6. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall not limit or restrict a
prosecuting agency's ability to remove an officer's name from a Brady-
Giglio list if, upon receipt of additional supporting or corroborating
information or a change in any factual circumstance at any time, the
prosecuting agency determines that the officer's name no longer requires
placement on a Brady-Giglio list.
Sec. 7. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall not limit the duty of a
prosecuting agency to produce Brady-Giglio discovery evidence in all
cases otherwise required by law, including after the initial placement of
the officer's name on a Brady-Giglio list, while the decision or a
request for reconsideration is still under consideration.
Sec. 8. (1) An officer aggrieved by a prosecuting agency's decision
to deny the officer's request for reconsideration under section 4 or 5 of
this act may file a petition in the district court seeking review of such
decision.
(2) The court shall have jurisdiction over the review of the
prosecuting agency's decision. The court shall perform an in camera
review of the evidence and may hold a closed hearing upon the request of
-6-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
the officer or prosecuting agency, or upon the court's own motion.
(3) Subject to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section,
the court may affirm, modify, or reverse a prosecuting agency's decision,
and issue any order or provide relief as justice may require, including
ordering the removal of the officer from a Brady-Giglio list.
(4) The court shall only modify or reverse a prosecuting agency's
decision to the extent that the court finds there is no reasonable basis
for concern that the information or actions of the officer that served as
the rationale for the placement of the officer on the Brady-Giglio list
will be material to the issues in any criminal case.
(5) A determination by a court that an officer should be removed
from a Brady-Giglio list shall not prevent a prosecuting agency from
making disclosures in individual cases that the prosecuting agency
believes to be necessary under Brady-Giglio case law.
(6) Evidence presented to the court under this section shall be
provided under seal and kept confidential unless otherwise provided by
law and ordered by the district court.
Sec. 9. (1) A public safety agency shall not publicly release an
officer's official photograph without the written permission of the
officer or his or her personal representative or without a request
pursuant to section 84-712.
(2) An officer's personal information, including, but not limited
to, the officer's home address, personal telephone number, personal email
address, date of birth, social security number, and operator's license
number shall be confidential and shall be redacted from any record prior
to the record's release to the public by the employing public safety
agency.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits the release of an officer's
photograph or unredacted personal information to the officer's legal
counsel, union representative, or designated employee representative upon
the request of the officer or his or her personal representative or legal
-7-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
counsel.
Sec. 10. An officer shall not be discharged, disciplined, or
threatened with discharge or discipline, or subject to revocation or
suspension of a certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, in
retaliation for exercising the rights of the officer enumerated in
sections 1 to 9 of this act.
Sec. 11. The rights enumerated in sections 1 to 9 of this act are
in addition to any other rights granted pursuant to a collective
bargaining agreement or other law.
Sec. 12. Section 28-610, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-610 (1) A person commits the offense of impersonating a peace
officer if he falsely pretends to be a peace officer and performs any act
in that pretended capacity.
(2) Impersonating a peace officer is a Class IV felony I
misdemeanor.
Sec. 13. Section 28-1205, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1205 (1)(a) Any person who uses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or any other deadly weapon to commit any felony which may be
prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of use of a
deadly weapon to commit a felony.
(b) Use of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class II felony.
(c) Use of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class IC felony.
(2)(a) Any person who possesses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or a destructive device during the commission of any felony
which may be prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of
possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony.
(b) Possession of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, during the
-8-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
commission of a felony is a Class III felony.
(c) Possession of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, during the
commission of a felony is a Class II felony.
(3)(a) Any person who carries a firearm or a destructive device
during the commission of a dangerous misdemeanor commits the offense of
carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of this subsection is a:
(i) Class I misdemeanor for a first or second offense; and
(ii) A Class IV felony for any third or subsequent offense.
(4) A violation of this section shall be treated as a separate and
distinct offense from the underlying crimes being committed, and a
sentence imposed under this section shall be consecutive to any other
sentence imposed.
(5) Possession of a deadly weapon may be proved through evidence
demonstrating either actual or constructive possession of a firearm, a
knife, brass or iron knuckles, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Dangerous misdemeanor means a misdemeanor violation of any of
the following offenses:
(i) Stalking under section 28-311.03;
(ii) Knowing violation of any protection order issued under the
Protection Orders Act;
(iii) Domestic assault under section 28-323;
(iv) Assault of an unborn child in the third degree under section
28-399;
(v) Theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01;
(vi) Unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle under section 28-516;
(vii) Criminal mischief under section 28-519 if such violation
arises from an incident involving the commission of a misdemeanor crime
-9-

LB1123 LB1123
2026 2026
of domestic violence;
(viii) Impersonating a police officer under section 28-610;
(viii) (ix) Resisting arrest under section 28-904;
(ix) (x) Operating a motor vehicle or vessel to avoid arrest under
section 28-905;
(x) (xi) Obstructing a peace officer under section 28-906; or
(xi) (xii) Any attempt under section 28-201 to commit an offense
described in subdivisions (6)(a)(i) through (x) (xi) of this section;
(b) Destructive device has the same meaning as in section 28-1213;
(c) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206; and
(d) Use of a deadly weapon includes the discharge, employment, or
visible display of any part of a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony or
communication to another indicating the presence of a firearm, a knife,
brass or iron knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device
during, immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a
felony, regardless of whether such firearm, knife, brass or iron
knuckles, deadly weapon, or destructive device was discharged, actively
employed, or displayed.
Sec. 14. Sections 1 to 11 of this act become operative on October
1, 2026. The other sections of this act become operative on their
effective date.
Sec. 15. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 16. Original section 28-610, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 28-1205, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-10-